Alabama, session 2026rs, HB91.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 12-19-312, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§12-19-312
(a) The fee allocated to the Solicitor's Fund shall be
expended for the payment of any and all expenses incurred by
Page 1

expended for the payment of any and all expenses incurred by
HB91 INTRODUCED
the district attorney in the discharge of the duties of the
office or for any legitimate law enforcement purpose.
(b) The fee allocated for the court clerk's fund shall
be expended at the discretion of the clerk, to support the
functions of the office of the clerk.
(c) The fees allocated to the Sheriff's Fund,
administered by the sheriff, shall be expended at the
direction of the sheriff for the operation of the jail to
support the functions of the office of the sheriff for law
enforcement purposes.
(d) The fees allocated to the Alabama Forensic Services
Trust Fund shall be expended for the objective analysis of
scientific evidence in pending criminal investigations."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2